Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.160

Education and training—Nonorthodontic removable oral devices and teeth whitening services.

Prior to providing the services mentioned in RCW 18.30.010(5) (c) and (d), a licensed denturist must provide documentation to the board that he or she received education and training on providing the services. The board must, by rule, specify the education and training necessary to provide the services mentioned in RCW 18.30.010(5) (c) and (d).

[ 2013 c 172 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 c 172: See note following RCW 18.30.010.